nb: Fingersystem for okarina: Asiatisk; Spesialtilpasset / produsentspesifikk; Engelsk; Italiensk; Annet
sl-SI: Sistem prstnih redov za okarino: Azijski; Po meri/specifično za proizvajalca; Angleški; Italijanski; Drugo
ro-RO: Sistem de digitație pentru ocarină: Asiatic; Personalizat/Specific producătorului; Englezesc; Italian; Altele
hr-HR: Okarina sustav prstovanja: Azijski; Prilagođen / specifičan za proizvođača; Engleski; Talijanski; Ostalo
pl: System otworów okaryny: Azjatycki; Niestandardowy/specyficzny dla producenta; Angielski; Włoski; Inny
zh-CN: 陶笛指法系统: 亚洲式; 自定义/制造商专用; 英式; 意式; 其他
ko: 오카리나 운지법 시스템: 아시안; 맞춤형/제조사 전용; 잉글리시; 이탈리안; 기타
vi: Hệ thống bấm ngón của kèn Ocarina: Châu Á; Tùy chỉnh/Theo nhà sản xuất; Anh; Ý; Khác
en: Ocarina fingering system: Asian; Custom/Manufacturer-specific; English; Italian; Other
fi: Okariinan sormitusjärjestelmä: Aasialainen; Mukautettu / valmistajakohtainen; Englantilainen; Italialainen; Muu
tr: Okarina parmak sistemi: Asya; Özel/Üreticiye özgü; İngiliz; İtalyan; Diğer
fr: Système de doigté de l'ocarina: Asiatique; Personnalisé/spécifique au fabricant; Anglais; Italien; Autre
es: Sistema de digitación de la ocarina: Asiático; Personalizado/específico del fabricante; Inglés; Italiano; Otro
el: Σύστημα παιξίματος οκαρίνας με τα δάκτυλα: Ασιατικό; Προσαρμοσμένο/Συγκεκριμένου κατασκευαστή; Αγγλικό; Ιταλικό; Άλλο
th: ระบบการวางนิ้วสำหรับโอคาริน่า: เอเชีย; กำหนดเอง/เฉพาะผู้ผลิต; อังกฤษ; อิตาลี; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 陶笛指法系統: 亞洲式; 自訂/製造商專屬; 英式; 義式; 其他
da: Ocarina-fingersystem: Asiatisk; Specialfremstillet/producentspecifikt; Engelsk; Italiensk; Andet
sv: Fingersättningssystem för okarina: Asiatiskt; Anpassat/tillverkarspecifikt; Engelskt; Italienskt; Övrigt
hu: Okarina fogásrendszere: Ázsiai; Egyedi / Gyártóspecifikus; Angol; Olasz; Egyéb
pt-BR: Sistema de digitação da ocarina: Asiático; Personalizado/Específico do fabricante; Inglês; Italiano; Outro
lt-LT: Okarinos natų pirštuotės sistema: Azijietiška; Pasirinktinė / pritaikyta gamintojo; Angliška; Itališka; Kita
ja: オカリナ運指システム: アジアン; カスタム/メーカー固有; イングリッシュ; イタリアン; その他
pt-PT: Sistema de dedilhado da ocarina: Asiático; Personalizado/específico do fabricante; Inglês; Italiano; Outro
sk-SK: Systém prstokladu okaríny: Ázijský; Vlastný/špecifický pre výrobcu; Anglický; Taliansky; Iný
cs: Systém prstokladu na okaríně: Asijský; Vlastní / specifický pro výrobce; Anglický; Italský; Ostatní
it: Sistema di diteggiatura dell'ocarina: Asiatico; Personalizzato/specifico del produttore; Inglese; Italiano; Altro
bg-BG: Система за пръстовка на окарина: Азиатска; Персонализирана/Специфична за производителя; Английска; Италианска; Друго
de: Griffsystem der Okarina: Asiatisch; Benutzerdefiniert/Herstellerspezifisch; Englisch; Italienisch; Andere
ru: Система аппликатуры окарины: Азиатская; Пользовательская / специфика производителя; Английская; Итальянская; Другое
nl: Vingerzettingssysteem ocarina: Aziatisch; Aangepast/merkspecifiek; Engels; Italiaans; Overig